California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
The deduction allowed by Section 194 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amortization of reforestation expenditures, shall be available only with respect to qualified timber property located in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 36.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17279.4.

Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expensing of environmental remediation costs, is modified as follows:

(a) For expenditures paid or incurred before January 1, 2004, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 198(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to have Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a qualified environmental
 remediation expenditure, Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that qualified environmental remediation expenditure for state purposes, a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5, and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make an election for federal purposes under Section 198(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to have Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a qualified environmental remediation expenditure, an election under Section 198(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes, Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that qualified environmental remediation expenditure for state purposes, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5.

(b) No inference as to the proper treatment for purposes of this part of qualified environmental remediation expenditures paid or incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 1998, shall be made.

(c) Section 198(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to termination, shall not apply.

(d) Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expensing of environmental remediation costs, shall not apply to expenditures paid or incurred after December 31, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 33.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17279.6.

Section 198A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expensing of qualified disaster expenses, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 29.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17280.

(a) No deduction shall be denied as provided by Section 265 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expenses and interest relating to tax-exempt income.

(b) No deduction shall be allowed for any of the following:

(1) Any amount otherwise allowable as a deduction which is allocable
 to one or more classes of income other than interest (whether or not any amount of income of that class or classes is received or accrued) wholly exempt from the taxes imposed by this part, or any amount otherwise allowable under Section 212 of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to expenses for production of income) which is allocable to interest (whether or not any amount of such interest is received or accrued) wholly exempt from the taxes imposed by this part.

(2) Interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry obligations the interest on which is wholly exempt from the taxes imposed by this part. The proper apportionment and allocation of the deduction with respect to taxable and nontaxable income shall be determined under rules and regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) Interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry
 shares of stock of a management company or series thereof which during the taxable year of the holder thereof distributes exempt-interest dividends.

(c) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b):

(1) “Interest” includes any amount paid or incurred—

(A) By any person making a short sale in connection with personal property used in that short sale, or

(B) By any other person for the use of any collateral with respect to that short sale.

(2) If—(A) The taxpayer provides cash as collateral for any short sale, and(B) The taxpayer receives no material earnings on that cash during the period of the sale,subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) shall not apply to that short sale.

(d) No deduction shall be denied under this section for interest on a mortgage on, or real property taxes on, the home of the taxpayer by reason of the receipt of an amount as either of the following:

(1) A military housing allowance.

(2) A parsonage allowance excludable from gross income under Section 107 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17282.

(a) In computing taxable income, deductions, including deductions for cost of goods sold, shall not be allowed to any taxpayer from any of his or her gross income directly derived from any act or omission of criminal profiteering activity, as defined in Section 186.2 of the Penal Code, or as defined in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11350) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, or Article 5 (commencing with Section 750) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of
 Division 1 of the Insurance Code; and deductions shall not be allowed to any taxpayer from any of his or her gross income derived from any other activities which directly tend to promote or to further, or are directly connected or associated with, those acts or omissions.

(b) A prior, final determination by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state in any criminal proceedings or any proceeding in which the state, county, city and county, city, or other political subdivision was a party thereto on the merits of the legality of the activities of a taxpayer, or predecessor in interest of a taxpayer, shall be required in order for subdivision (a) to apply and shall be binding upon the Franchise Tax Board and the State Board of Equalization.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), this section shall be applied with respect to taxable years that
 have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise as of September 14, 1982.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 962 of the Statutes of 1984 shall be applied with respect to taxable years that have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise as of January 1, 1985.

(3) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 454 of the Statutes of 2011 shall be applied with respect to taxable years that have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise as of the effective date of that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 171.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17286.

In addition to the deduction denied under Section 162(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to payments made to officials or employees of a foreign government, no deduction shall be allowed for any payment that would be unlawful under the laws of the United States, if those laws were applicable to the payment and to the official or employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 143.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17287.

Section 269A of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “California Personal Income Tax” for “Federal income tax.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 34.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17299.8.

The Franchise Tax Board may disallow a deduction under this part to an individual or entity for amounts paid as remuneration for personal services if that individual or entity fails to report the payments required under Section 13050 of the Unemployment Insurance Code or Section 18631 on the date prescribed therefor (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17299.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions in this part, in the case of a taxpayer who owns real property and has either failed to provide information required pursuant to Section 18642, or has provided information which is either false, misleading, or incomplete in the information return required pursuant to Section 18642, no deduction shall be allowed for interest, taxes, depreciation, or amortization paid or incurred with respect to that real property, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) No deduction shall be allowed for the items provided in subdivision (a) from 60 days after the due date for filing the information return required pursuant to Section 18642 until the date the Franchise Tax Board determines that all provisions of Section 18642 have been complied with.

(c) In the event the period of noncompliance does not cover an entire taxable year, the deductions shall be denied at the rate of one-twelfth for each full month during the period of noncompliance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 10.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Special Rules for Nonresidents and Part-Year Residents [17301. - 17307.]

17301.

For purposes of this part, in the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the proper apportionment and allocation of the deductions in computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041 with respect to sources of income within and without the state shall be determined under rules and regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.3.

For purposes of this part, in the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the term “California adjusted gross income” includes each of the following:

(a) For any part of the taxable year during which the taxpayer was a resident of this state (as defined by Section 17014), all items of adjusted gross income, regardless of source.

(b) For any part of the taxable year during which the taxpayer was not a resident of this state,
 adjusted gross income derived from sources within this state, determined in accordance with Article 9 (commencing with Section 17301) of Chapter 3 and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 13, Sec. 3.   Effective February 11, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.4.

For purposes of this part, in the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the term “total adjusted gross income” means adjusted gross income for the entire year determined under Section 17072 regardless of source, taking into account paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17024.5 and Section 17203.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17301.5.

For purposes of this part, in the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the term “total taxable income” means taxable income for the entire year determined under Section 17073 regardless of source.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17302.

(a) In the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the deduction provided by Section 215 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alimony, etc., payments, as it read on January 1, 2015, shall be allowed in computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” in the same ratio (not to exceed 1.00) that California adjusted gross income (as defined in Section 17301.3), computed without regard to the alimony deduction, bears to total adjusted gross income (as defined in Section 17301.4), computed without regard to the alimony deduction.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply for any divorce or separation instrument executed after December 31, 2025, or for any divorce or
 separation instrument executed on or before December 31, 2025, and modified after that date, if the modification expressly provides that the amendments made by this subdivision apply to such modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 23.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17304.

In the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, itemized deductions allowed as a deduction for the taxable year under Section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Section 17073, or the standard deduction (as provided in Section 17073.5), shall be allowed in computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” in the ratio (not to exceed 1.00) that California adjusted gross income (as defined in Section 17301.3) bears to total adjusted gross income (as defined in Section 17301.4).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17306.

In the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, in computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, references to “adjusted gross income” for purposes of computing limitations based upon adjusted gross income, shall mean “California adjusted gross income” (as defined in Section 17301.3) for the same taxable year without regard to the limitation used pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17024.5 in computing “total adjusted gross income” (as defined in Section
 17301.4) for that taxable year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17307.

In the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, in computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, for purposes of computing limitations on the deductions described in this section, any reference to “compensation” or “earned income” shall be a reference to the amount of “compensation” or “earned income” required to be included in computing “California adjusted gross income” (as defined in Section 17301.3) for the same taxable year without regard to the limitation used pursuant to
 Section 17203 in computing “total adjusted gross income” (as defined in Section 17301.4) for that taxable year.

(a) The deduction allowed by Section 219 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The deductions allowed by Sections 162(1) and 404 of the Internal Revenue Code in the case of an individual who is an employee within the meaning of Section 401(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Corporate Distributions and Adjustments [17321. - 17324.]

17321.

Subchapter C of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to corporate distributions and adjustments, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 16.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17321.1.

The amendments to Section 367(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as enacted by Section 14102 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to repeal of the exception for transfers of certain property used in the active conduct of a trade or business, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 46.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17322.

For purposes of Section 302(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, the periods of limitation to be extended for one year are the periods provided in Sections 19057 and 19371.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 11.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

17322.5.

Section 381(c)(20) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to carryforward of disallowed business interest, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 47.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17323.

(a) Section 382(n) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for certain ownership changes, shall not apply.

(b) Section 382(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application to carryforward of disallowed interest, shall not apply. 

(c) The amendments made by Section 13301(b)(3) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 382(k)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to loss corporation, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 48.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

17324.

Section 312(k)(3)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for real estate investment trusts, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 49.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Deferred Compensation [17501. - 17510.]

17501.

(a) Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deferred compensation, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Notwithstanding the specified date contained in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5, Part I of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to pension, profitsharing, stock bonus plans, etc., and Part III of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rules relating to minimum funding standards and benefit limitations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided, without regard to taxable year to the same extent as applicable for federal income
 tax purposes.

(c) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, the maximum amount of elective deferrals (as defined in Section 402(g)(3)) for the taxable year that may be excluded from gross income under Section 402(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for state purposes, shall not exceed the amount of elective deferrals that may be excluded from gross income under Section 402(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, as in effect on January 1, 2010, including additional elective deferrals under Section 414(v) of the Internal Revenue Code, as in effect on January 1, 2010.

(d) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, the basis of any person in the plan, account, or annuity shall be increased by the amount of elective deferrals not
 excluded as a result of the application of the elective deferral limitations imposed by subdivision (c).

(2) Any basis described in paragraph (1) shall be recovered in the manner specified in Section 17085.

(e) Notwithstanding the limitations provided in subdivision (c), any income attributable to elective deferrals in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, in conformance with Part I of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for federal and state purposes, shall not be includable in the gross income of the individual for whose benefit the plan or account was established until distributed pursuant to the plan or by operation of law.

(f) (1) Section 408A(e)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified rollover contribution, shall not apply.

(2) In the case of any distribution made under Section 529(c)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the special rollover to Roth IRAs from long-term qualified tuition programs, treated for federal income tax purposes as a “qualified rollover contribution” under Section 408A(e)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, the amount of that distribution shall, notwithstanding Section 529 or Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code to the contrary, be includable in the gross income of the distributee in the manner as provided under Section 72 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision, no increase in the basis
 of the Roth IRA, as defined in Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code, shall result from any amount distributed as described in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 50.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17501.5.

The amendments made by Section 641 of the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-16) to the following provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or other federal law shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), with respect to distributions after December 31, 2001, except as otherwise provided:

(a) Section 72, relating to annuities and certain proceeds of endowment and life insurance
 contracts.

(b) Section 219, relating to retirement savings.

(c) Section 401, relating to qualified pension, profit-sharing, and stock bonus plans.

(d) Section 402, relating to taxability of beneficiary of employees’ trust.

(e) Section 403, relating to taxation of employee annuities.

(f) Section 408, relating to individual retirement accounts.

(g) Section 415, relating to limitations on benefits and contribution under qualified plans.

(h) Section 457, relating to deferred compensation plans of state and local governments and tax-exempt organizations.

(i) Subsections (h)(3) and (h)(5) of Section 1122 of the Tax Reform Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 30, Sec. 1.   Effective April 26, 2002.   Applicable as provided in Sec. 4 of Ch. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

17501.7.

The amendments made by Section 647 of the Economic Growth and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001 (Public Law 107-16) to the following provisions of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), with respect to trustee-to-trustee transfers after December 31, 2001, except as otherwise provided:

(a) Section 403, relating to taxation of employee annuities.

(b) Section 457, relating to deferred compensation plans of state and local governments and tax-exempt organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective April 26, 2002.   Applicable as provided in Sec. 4 of Ch. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

17501.8.

(a) The following amendments made by the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 (Public Law 117-328) shall apply for purposes of this part, Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) except as otherwise provided:

(1) The amendments made by Section 108 of Division T of that act to Section 219(b)(5)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to indexing IRA catch-up limit.

(2) The amendments made by Section 109 of Division T of that act to Section 414(v) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to higher
 catch-up limit to apply at 60 to 63 years of age, inclusive.

(3) The amendments made by Section 117 of Division T of that act to Section 414(v)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contribution limit for simple plans.

(b) (1) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, as it pertains to the deductions expanded by this section, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of this bill is to conform state law to changes in federal law in order to reduce complications relating to mismatches in basis of retirement accounts for federal income tax purposes compared to state income
 tax purposes.

(B) The performance indicators used by the Legislature to
 determine if the deductions are achieving the stated goal shall be the number of taxpayers making contributions that would, but for the expansion of deductions pursuant to this section, be included in income for state purposes, and the total dollar value of those contributions.

(2) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall, no later than October 1, 2029, submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that estimates the number of taxpayers making contributions to retirement accounts that, but for the expansion of deductions provided by this section, would be included in income, and estimates of the total dollar value of those contributions, to the extent data is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 51.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17502.

(a) In addition to the application of Part II (commencing with Section 421) of Subchapter D of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain stock options, paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of Section 421(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall also apply to any California qualified stock option that is granted to an individual whose earned income from the corporation granting the California qualified stock option for the taxable year in which that option is exercised does not exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000).
 In the event that the option does not meet the necessary qualifications, the option shall be treated as a nonqualified stock option.

(b) For purposes of this section, “California qualified stock option” means a stock option that is issued and exercised pursuant to this section and that is designated by the corporation issuing the option as a California qualified stock option at the time the option is granted.

(c) (1) This section shall apply only to those stock options that are issued on or after January 1, 1997, and before January 1, 2002, by a corporation to its employee and are exercised by the employee, while employed by the corporation that issued those stock options (or within three months thereof, or within one year thereof if permanently and totally disabled as defined in Section 22(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code), during the taxable year with
 respect to any class of shares, or combination thereof, issued by the corporation, to the extent that the number of shares transferable by the exercise of the options does not exceed a total of 1,000 and have a combined fair market value of less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The combined fair market value of any stock shall be determined as of the time the option with respect to that stock is granted.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be applied by taking options into account in the order in which they were granted.

(d) In the case of a California qualified stock option, no amount shall be included in the gross income of the employee until the time of the disposition of the option (or the stock acquired upon exercise of the option).

No deduction shall be allowed under Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code to the employer on the
 grant or exercise of a California qualified stock option.

(e) Subdivision (d) shall not apply to any stock option for which an election has been made under Section 83(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election to include in gross income in year of transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 604, Sec. 7.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17504.

(a) The provisions of Section 402 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to taxability of beneficiaries of employees’ trusts, shall be modified as follows:

(1) The amendments and transitional rules made by Public Law 99-514 shall be applicable to this part for the same transactions and the same years as they are applicable for federal purposes, except as otherwise provided.

(2) The basis of any person in an
 employees’ trust shall include the amount of any contributions made prior to January 1, 1987, which were not allowed as a deduction under former Sections 17503 and 17513 (including predecessor Section 17524 repealed by Chapter 488 of the Statutes of 1983) relating to special limitations for self-employed individuals.

(b) (1) There is hereby imposed a tax on lump-sum distributions computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 402(d) of the Internal Revenue Code using the rates and brackets prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 17041 (without regard to Section 17045) in lieu of the rates and brackets in Section 1(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. The recipient of the lump-sum distribution shall be liable for the tax imposed by this paragraph.

(2) For purposes of this part, the provisions of Section 1122(h) of Public Law 99-514, as modified by Section
 1011A(b) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply, except as modified by each of the following:

(A) The provisions of Section 1122(h)(3)(B) of Public Law 99-514 shall be modified to refer to Section 17041 rather than Section 1 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(B) The provisions of Section 1122(h)(3)(B)(ii) of Public Law 99-514 shall be modified to provide a tax rate of 5.5 percent rather than a tax rate of 20 percent.

(C) The provisions of Section 1122(h)(5) of Public Law 99-514 shall be modified to refer to Section 17041 rather than Section 1 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

(3) For purposes of this section, a taxpayer shall elect the same special lump-sum distribution averaging method for purposes of this part as that elected for federal purposes
 under Section 402(d)(4)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) The provisions of Section 1124(a) of Public Law 99-514, as amended by Section 1011A(d) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply.

(5) The provisions of Section 1124(c) of Public Law 99-514, as added by Section 1011A(d) of Public Law 100-647, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 18.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17506.

The provisions of Section 403 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to taxation of employee annuities, shall be modified to provide that the basis of any person in an employee annuity shall include the amount of any contributions made prior to January 1, 1987, which were not allowed as a deduction under former Sections 17503 and 17513 of the Revenue and Taxation Code (including predecessor Section 17524 repealed by Chapter 488 of the Statutes of 1983) relating to special limitations for self-employed individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1243, Sec. 23.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17507.

The provisions of Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to individual retirement accounts, shall be modified as follows:

(a) The following provisions shall be incorporated into Section 408(e) of the Internal Revenue Code:

(1) In the case of a plan in existence in taxable year 1975 where contributions were made pursuant to, and in conformance with, Section 408 or 409 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended by
 the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-406), any net income attributable to the 1975 contribution shall not be includable in the gross income, for taxable year 1977 or succeeding taxable years, of the individual for whose benefit the plan was established until distributed pursuant to the provisions of the plan or by operation of law.

(2) In the case of a simplified employee pension, where contributions are also made pursuant to, and in conformance with, the provisions of Section 408(k) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, the net income attributable to the nondeductible portion of those contributions shall not be includable in the gross income of the individual for whose benefit the plan was established for the taxable year or for succeeding taxable years until distributed pursuant to the provisions of the plan or by operation of law.

(3) Notwithstanding the limitations provided in former Section 17272 (as amended by Chapter 1461 of the Statutes of 1985) with respect to the amount of deductible contributions and individuals eligible for the deduction, any income attributable to contributions made to a plan in existence in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1982, in conformance with Sections 219, 220, 408, and 409 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, shall not be includable in the gross income of the individual for whose benefit the plan was established until distributed pursuant to the provisions of the plan or by operation of law.

(b) The provisions of Section 408(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the tax treatment of distributions, are modified as follows:

(1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1982, and before January 1, 1987, the basis of any person in
 the account or annuity is the amount of contributions not allowed as a deduction under former subdivision (a), (e), or (g) of Section 17272 (as amended by Chapter 1461 of the Statutes of 1985) on account of the purchase of the account or annuity.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the rules for recovery of basis shall be governed by Section 17085.

(c) A copy of the report, which is required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 408(i) or 408(l) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in those sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 39.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17508.

The provisions of Section 408(o) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to definitions and rules relating to nondeductible contributions to individual retirement plans, shall be applicable and the information required to be reported shall be reported on the return filed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 at the time and in the manner as specified in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 12.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

17508.2.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(a) By substituting the phrase “five percent” in lieu of the phrase “20 percent” in Section 409A(a)(1)(B)(i)(II) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) By substituting the phrase “five percent” in lieu of the phrase “20 percent” in Section
 409A(b)(5)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   (AB 1173)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17509.

Sections 413(b)(6) and 413(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to liability for funding tax, do not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17509.5.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, Section 530A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to 530A accounts, added by Section 70204(a)(1) of Public Law 119-21, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) The amount of the additional tax imposed under Section 530A(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax treatment of allowable distributions, as applicable for federal income tax purposes for the same taxable year, shall be computed using a rate of 2.5 percent in lieu of the rate provided in that section.

(c) Section 530A(d)(5)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to distributions of excess contributions, shall not apply.

(d) Section 530A(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to trustee selection, shall not apply.

(e) A copy of the report required to be filed with the Secretary of the Treasury under Section 530A(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reports, shall be filed with the Franchise Tax Board at the same time and in the same manner as specified in that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 85, Sec. 6.   (SB 180)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.

Section 7701(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to Federal Thrift Savings Funds, applies, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Accounting Periods and Methods of Accounting [17551. - 17570.]

17551.

(a) Subchapter E of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to accounting periods and methods of accounting, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 444(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to effect of election, shall not apply.

(c) Section 451(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to inclusion not later than for financial accounting purposes, shall not apply to specified credit card fees, as defined in Treasury Regulations Section 1.451-3(j)(2).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the specified date contained in paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5, Section 457
 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deferred compensation plans of state and local governments and tax-exempt organizations, shall apply, except as otherwise provided, without regard to taxable year to the same extent as applicable for federal income tax purposes.

(2) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, the maximum deferred compensation for the taxable year that may be excluded from gross income under Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for state purposes, shall not exceed the amount of deferred compensation that may be excluded from gross income under Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, as in effect on January 1, 2010, including additional elective deferrals under Section 414(v) of the Internal Revenue Code, as in effect on January 1, 2010.

(e) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, the basis of any person in the plan shall be increased by the amount of compensation not allowed to be excluded under subdivision (a).

(2) Any basis described in paragraph (1) shall be recovered in the manner specified in Section 17085.

(f) Notwithstanding the limitations provided in subdivision (a), any income attributable to compensation deferred in a plan in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, in conformance with Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for federal and state purposes, shall not be includable in the gross income of the individual for whose benefit the plan was established until distributed
 pursuant to the provisions of the plan or by
 operation of law.

(g) Section 451(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for sales or dispositions to implement Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or state electric restructuring policy, shall not apply.

(h) Section 457A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to nonqualified deferred compensation from certain tax indifferent parties, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 24.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17552.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17565, a return for a period of less than 12 months shall also be made when the Franchise Tax Board terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under Section 19082 (relating to tax in jeopardy).
